Washington statutes.
RCW 19.310.130

Violations—Misdemeanor.

A person who engages in business as an exchange facilitator and who violates RCW 19.310.100 (11) or (12) is guilty of a misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2009 c 70 s 14.]